Utah statutes.
54-1-1.5.   Appointment of members -- Terms -- Qualifications -- Chairman -- Quorum -- Removal -- Vacancies -- Compensation.

The commission shall be composed of three members appointed by the governor with the consent of the Senate.  The terms of the members shall be staggered so that one commissioner is appointed for a term of six years on March 1 of each odd-numbered year.  Not more than two members of the commission shall belong to the same political party.  One member of the commission shall be designated by the governor as chairman of the commission.  Any two commissioners constitute a quorum.  Any member of the commission may be removed for cause by the governor.  Vacancies in the commission shall be filled for unexpired terms by appointment of the governor.  Commissioners shall receive compensation as established by the governor within the salary range fixed by the Legislature in Title 67, Chapter 22, State Officer Compensation, and all actual and necessary expenses incurred in attending to official business.  Each commissioner at the time of appointment and qualification shall be a resident citizen of the United States and of the state of Utah and shall be not less than 30 years of age.  Except as provided by law, no commissioner may hold any other office either under the government of the United States or of this state or of any municipal corporation within this state.



Amended by Chapter 176, 2002 General Session

